Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Alcoholic Beverages, Controlled Substances, Narcotic Drugs, Weapons, and Other Contraband

§ 47-5-191.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 47-5-191 through 47-5-195, “alcoholic beverage” shall have the meaning defined in Section 67-1-5 of the Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law of the State of Mississippi; “controlled substance” means any substance defined as a controlled substance by the Uniform Controlled Substances Law of the State of Mississippi; “narcotic drug” means any substance defined as a narcotic drug by Section 41-29-105; “weapon or deadly weapon” shall mean any weapon or firearm mentioned in Section 97-37-1, and any rifle or shotgun regardless of barrel length; and “contraband” means coin or currency, money orders, traveler’s checks, promissory notes, credit cards, personal checks or other negotiable instruments, knives, sharpened instruments, tools, explosives, ammunition and drug paraphernalia as defined in Section 41-29-105(v).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 394, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 341, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 420, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 47-5-192.
Possession of prohibited items by persons other than offenders.

The Commissioner of Corrections may prohibit the possession by employees or officers of the Department of Corrections or any person allowed upon the premises of a correctional facility under his jurisdiction of any item, the possession of which by offenders is prohibited or regulated.

The commissioner may distinguish between classes of employees and visitors and may establish zones or designate areas or facilities where such regulations apply in his discretion and as necessary for security and orderly operation of prison facilities.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules authorized by this section in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act.

Any person who violates a duly enacted rule authorized by this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 423, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1986).

§ 47-5-193.
Prohibitions generally; circuit court authorized to order disabling of contraband cell phone service from carrier.

It is unlawful for any officer or employee of the department, of any county sheriff’s department, of any private correctional facility in this state in which offenders are confined, of any municipal or other correctional facility in this state, or for any other person or offender to possess, furnish, attempt to furnish, or assist in furnishing to any offender confined in this state any weapon, deadly weapon, unauthorized electronic device, contraband item, or cell phone or any of its components or accessories to include, but not limited to, Subscriber Information Module (SIM) cards or chargers. It is unlawful for any person or offender to take, attempt to take, or assist in taking any weapon, deadly weapon, unauthorized electronic device, contraband item, cell phone or any of its components or accessories to include, but not limited to, Subscriber Information Module (SIM) cards or chargers on property within the state belonging to the department, a county, a municipality, or other entity that is occupied or used by offenders, except as authorized by law.

The circuit court is authorized to issue an order to disable the contraband cell phone service from the carrier.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 423, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 420, § ; Laws, 1998, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 5, 2012.); Laws, 2019, ch. 449, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 2019).

§ 47-5-194.
Prohibition against possession of cash or negotiable instruments; limitations upon prohibition; confiscation of money found in excess of allowable amounts; disposition of moneys confiscated.

It is unlawful for any offender committed to the department to possess:

Coin or currency on his person or in premises assigned to him or under his control;

A money order, traveler’s check, promissory note, credit card, personal check or other negotiable instrument.

Subsection (1) does not apply to offenders who are granted a parole; placed on work release, supervised earned release, earned probation or probation; or granted leave for the duration of such leave; however, these offenders may be restricted by the parole or probation order or by order of the commissioner with respect to amounts or form of money possessed or controlled by the offenders.

A violation of subsection (1) shall be considered a rules violation or a violation of the conditions of parole or probation as the case may be and shall be processed in the manner of similar violations.

Any money possessed by an offender may be confiscated by the corrections officer who discovers the possession. The department shall establish a policy and procedure for the collection and accounting of all confiscated funds. All confiscated coin or currency shall be deposited in a special fund which is created in the State Treasury. The money in this special fund may be appropriated by the Legislature to enhance the security of the department’s facilities. Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, but funds may be expended only by appropriation approved by the Legislature. Any interest earned on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

The possession of coin, currency, money order, traveler’s check or other negotiable instrument on the grounds of a facility is prohibited.

The department shall establish a cashless system for facilities no later than July 1, 1996. The department shall provide lockers for visitors to place prohibited items when on grounds of a facility. The department is authorized to charge visitors an hourly rental fee for use of the lockers. Community work centers and restitution centers are exempt unless designated by the commissioner as being included in the cashless system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 319, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 421, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 47-5-195.
Penalties for violations.

Any person who violates any provision of Section 47-5-193 or 47-5-194 shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be punished by confinement in the Penitentiary for not less than three (3) years nor more than fifteen (15) years, and may be fined not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 394, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 391, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 47-5-196.
Mandatory drug testing of employees of Department of Corrections.

The Department of Corrections shall develop and implement a drug testing program for its employees no later than July 1, 1997. The department shall develop a written policy for alcohol and drug testing of employees to deter the use of alcohol and drugs at its facilities and to ensure an alcohol and drug free environment at correctional facilities. Participation by employees is mandatory and the tests may be conducted in a random manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997).

§ 47-5-198.
Sale, possession, or use of controlled substances or narcotic drugs within facilities; knowledge by employees; punishment for violations.

It is unlawful for any person to sell within, bring to, or be in possession of, in any correctional facility or convict camp within the state or any county, municipal or other jail within the state, except as authorized by law, any controlled substance or narcotic drug.

It is unlawful for any person who is the keeper or officer in charge of the facility, camp or jail, or who is employed in or about the facility, camp or jail to knowingly permit any controlled substance or narcotic drug to be sold, possessed or used therein contrary to law.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section and is convicted shall be fined up to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and be punished by imprisonment for not less than three (3) years nor more than seven (7) years; and the person is not eligible for probation, parole, suspension of sentence, earned time allowance or any other reduction of sentence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 391, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.